Idaho statutes. TITLE 34 ELECTIONS
CHAPTER 15
PRESIDENTIAL ELECTORS

Section.

34-1501. Certificates of election.

The secretary of state shall prepare lists of the names of the electors of president and vice-president of the United States, elected at any election, procure thereto the signature of the governor, affix the seal of the state to the same, and deliver one (1) of such certificates thus signed to each of said electors on or before the second Wednesday in December next after such election.

34-1502. Election for presidential electors.

There shall be an election held in this state for the election of such electors, at the times appointed by any law of the Congress or the Constitution of the United States for such election, and when such election shall be special, the same shall be called and held, and the votes polled and canvassed, in all respects as at a general election, and the duties of the electors so elected shall be the same as prescribed by law for electors elected at a general election.

34-1503. Meeting of electors.

The electors chosen to elect a president and vice-president of the United States shall, at twelve (12) o’clock noon on the day which is or may be directed by the Congress of the United States, meet at the seat of government of this state, and then and there perform the duties enjoined upon them by the Constitution and laws of the United States.

34-1504. Notice to governor — Vacancies, how filled.

Each elector of president and vice-president of the United States shall, before the hour of twelve (12) o’clock on the day next preceding the day fixed by the law of Congress to elect a president and vice-president, give notice to the governor that he is at the seat of government and ready at the proper time to perform the duties of an elector; and the governor shall forthwith deliver to the electors present a certificate of all the names of the electors; and if any elector named therein fails to appear before nine (9) o’clock on the morning of the day of election of president and vice-president as aforesaid, the electors then present shall immediately proceed to elect, by ballot, in the presence of the governor, persons to fill such vacancies.

34-1505. Filling vacancies — Tie vote.

If more than the number of persons required to fill the vacancies, as aforesaid, have the highest and an equal number of votes, then the governor, in the presence of the electors attending, shall decide by lot which of said persons shall be elected; otherwise they, to the number required, having the greatest number of votes, shall be considered elected to fill such vacancies.

34-1506. Notification of election to fill vacancy.

Immediately after such choice is made the names of the persons so chosen shall forthwith be certified to the governor by the electors making such choice; and the governor shall cause immediate notice to be given in writing to the electors chosen to fill such vacancies; and the said persons so chosen shall be electors, and shall meet the other electors at the same time and place, and then and there discharge all and singular the duties enjoined on them as electors aforesaid by the Constitution and laws of the United States and of this state.

34-1507. Compensation and mileage of electors.

Every elector of this state for the election of president and vice president of the United States, hereafter elected, who shall attend and give his vote for those offices at the time and place appointed by law, shall be compensated as provided by section 59-509(d), Idaho Code.